Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8545.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-1.7-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1.7 entitled "Rhode
Island Program to Address Alzheimer’s Disease" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-1.7-5. Medical professional training.
(a) All physicians licensed pursuant to chapter 37 of title 5, and nurses licensed pursuant
to chapter 34 of title 5, shall, no later than October 1, 2023, complete a one-time course of training
consisting of and physician assistants licensed pursuant to chapter 54 of title 5, shall complete a
minimum of one hour of instruction every other renewal cycle on the diagnosis, treatment, and care
of patients with cognitive impairments including, but not limited to, Alzheimer’s disease and
related disorders. Individuals providing care solely in pediatrics, radiology, and pathology may be
exempt from the provisions of the required medical professional training through rules promulgated
by the department.
(b) The department of health shall promulgate rules to implement the training requirement
of subsection (a).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006434
========